Massachusetts, session 194th, S2755.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of higher 
education shall ascertain the necessary steps and cost of providing debt-free public college in the 
commonwealth. Debt-free public college shall be defined as (i) allowing all eligible students 
with unmet financial need to attend public institutions of higher education without taking on loan 
burdens after all sources of grant aid and expected family contribution have been applied; and 
(ii) meeting the basic need expenses including, but not limited to, housing, food, child care, 
transportation and health care, of eligible low-income students to enable them to take full 
advantage of tuition and fee-free college access opportunities.  
The department shall issue a report of its findings, including, but not limited to: (i) a 
definition of eligible students; (ii) a method of determining the total annual cost of debt-free 
college for eligible students at public institutions of higher education in the commonwealth, 
which may include conducting a survey of current or prospective students; (iii) a numerical 
calculation of the total cost of debt-free college for eligible students at public institutions of 
higher education in the commonwealth for not less than each of the next 3 years using current 

of 2 15 and estimated enrollment trends and the total annual projected cost to the commonwealth; (iv) an 
analysis of which student populations would most benefit from debt-free higher education; and 
(vi) recommendations for funding and implementing debt-free higher education, accounting for 
federal policy changes and state requirements, and including any statutory or budgetary changes 
needed to achieve said recommendations. As part of their work, the department shall consider 
best practices from municipalities, states and countries which provide debt-free or similar public 
college programs. The department may enter into a contract with a third-party for the purposes of 
investigating and completing said report.  
The department of higher education shall submit a report of its findings and 
recommendations to the clerks of the house and the senate, the house and senate committees on 
ways and means and the joint committee on higher education not later than one year following 
enactment of this act.